Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-859
Nebraska Health Education Assistance Loan Program; loans; how funded.

Any loan made, purchased, or caused to be made or purchased
pursuant to section 58-858 may be funded with
the proceeds of bonds, notes, or other obligations of the authority issued
pursuant to sections 58-857
to 58-862. The resolution
or trust indenture creating such bonds, notes, or other obligations
may contain any of the provisions specified in section 58-843 as
the authority shall deem appropriate and any other provisions, not in violation
of law, as the authority shall deem reasonable and proper for the security
of the holders of such bonds, notes, or other obligations.

The proceeds of any such bonds, notes, or other obligations
may be used and applied by the authority to make loans, to purchase loans,
to cause loans to be made or purchased, to pay financing costs, including,
but not limited to, legal, underwriting, investment banking, accounting, rating
agency, printing, and other similar costs, to fund any reserve funds deemed
necessary or advisable by the authority, to pay interest on such bonds, notes,
or other obligations for any period deemed necessary or advisable by the authority,
and to pay all other necessary and incidental costs and expenses.

Laws 1983, LB 159, § 9;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2956;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 56;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1756;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 59.